Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.170

Fine or costs—Payment within specified time or installments—Payment priority order.

(1) When a defendant is sentenced to pay fines, penalties, assessments, fees, restitution, or costs, the court may grant permission for payment to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments. If the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3), the court shall grant permission for payment to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments. If no such permission is included in the sentence the fine or costs shall be payable forthwith.

(2) An offender's monthly payment shall be applied in the following order of priority until satisfied:

(a) First, proportionally to restitution to victims that have not been fully compensated from other sources;

(b) Second, proportionally to restitution to insurance or other sources with respect to a loss that has provided compensation to victims;

(c) Third, proportionally to crime victims' assessments; and

(d) Fourth, proportionally to costs, fines, and other assessments required by law.

[ 2022 c 260 s 19; 2018 c 269 s 7; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 96 s 2.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.

Construction—2018 c 269: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Payment of fine and costs in installments: RCW 9.92.070.